District of Columbia statutes.
3-1317

Depositories.

The Board may authorize compensation to such depositories in such manner and amounts and subject to such limitations as the Board may determine. The depositories referred to in § 3-1316 shall transfer the deposits made pursuant to § 3-1316 to the designated accounts of the Board, less any compensation for services rendered by the depositories to the Fund, and less any amounts due the agents or depositories by adjustments authorized by the Board because of depository or agent errors. The depositories shall file reports of their receipts and transactions in such form and containing such information as the Board may require.

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-172, § 4, 27 DCR 4736
1981 Ed., § 2-2517.